California statutes. Penal Code
(5) For the purposes of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), a mental illness is a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder, or post-traumatic stress disorder but excluding antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia. A court may conclude that a defendant’s mental illness was connected to the offense if, after reviewing any relevant and credible evidence, including, but not limited to, police reports,
 preliminary hearing transcripts, witness statements, statements by the defendant’s mental health treatment provider, medical records, records or reports by qualified medical experts, or evidence that the defendant displayed symptoms consistent with the relevant mental disorder at or near the time of the offense, the court concludes that the defendant’s mental illness substantially contributed to the defendant’s involvement in the commission of the offense.

(6) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Childhood trauma” means that as a minor the person experienced physical, emotional, or sexual abuse, physical or emotional neglect. A court may conclude that a defendant’s childhood trauma was connected to the offense if, after reviewing any relevant and credible evidence, including, but not limited to, police reports, preliminary
 hearing transcripts, witness statements, medical records, or records or reports by qualified medical experts, the court concludes that the defendant’s childhood trauma substantially contributed to the defendant’s involvement in the commission of the offense.

(B) “Prior victimization” means the person was a victim of intimate partner violence, sexual violence, or human trafficking, or the person has experienced psychological or physical trauma, including, but not limited to, abuse, neglect, exploitation, or sexual violence. A court may conclude that a defendant’s prior victimization was connected to the offense if, after reviewing any relevant and credible evidence, including, but not limited to, police reports, preliminary hearing transcripts, witness statements, medical records, or records or reports by qualified medical experts, the court concludes that the defendant’s prior victimization substantially contributed to the defendant’s
 involvement in the commission of the offense.

(7) This subdivision shall apply to all sentencings occurring after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 160.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1385.1.

Notwithstanding Section 1385 or any other provision of law, a judge shall not strike or dismiss any special circumstance which is admitted by a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or is found by a jury or court as provided in Sections 190.1 to 190.5, inclusive.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

1386.

The entry of a nolle prosequi is abolished, and neither the Attorney General nor the district attorney can discontinue or abandon a prosecution for a public offense, except as provided in Section 1385.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

1387.

(a) An order terminating an action pursuant to this chapter, or Section 859b, 861, 871, or 995, is a bar to any other prosecution for the same offense if it is a felony or if it is a misdemeanor charged together with a felony and the action has been previously terminated pursuant to this chapter, or Section 859b, 861, 871, or 995, or if it is a misdemeanor not charged together with a felony, except in those felony cases, or those cases where a misdemeanor is charged with a felony, where subsequent to the dismissal of the felony or misdemeanor the judge or magistrate finds any of the following:

(1) That substantial new evidence has been discovered by the prosecution that would not have been known through the exercise of due diligence at, or prior to, the time of
 termination of the action.

(2) That the termination of the action was the result of the direct intimidation of a material witness, as shown by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3) That the termination of the action was the result of the failure to appear by the complaining witness, who had been personally subpoenaed in a prosecution arising under subdivision (e) of Section 243, or Section 273.5, 273.6, or 261, where the complaining witness is the spouse of the defendant, or former Section 262. This paragraph shall apply only within six months of the original dismissal of the action, and may be invoked only once in each action. This section does not preclude a defendant from being eligible for diversion.

(4) That the termination of the action was the result of the complaining witness being found in contempt of court
 as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1219 of the Code of Civil Procedure. This paragraph shall apply only within six months of the original dismissal of the action, and may be invoked only once in each action.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an order terminating an action pursuant to this chapter is not a bar to another prosecution for the same offense if it is a misdemeanor charging an offense based on an act of domestic violence, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 13700, and the termination of the action was the result of the failure to appear by the complaining witness, who had been personally subpoenaed. This subdivision shall apply only within six months of the original dismissal of the action, and may be invoked only once in each action. This subdivision does not preclude a defendant from being eligible for diversion.

(c) An order terminating an
 action is not a bar to prosecution if a complaint is dismissed before the commencement of a preliminary hearing in favor of an indictment filed pursuant to Section 944 and the indictment is based upon the same subject matter as charged in the dismissed complaint, information, or indictment.

However, if the previous termination was pursuant to Section 859b, 861, 871, or 995, the subsequent order terminating an action is not a bar to prosecution if:

(1) Good cause is shown why the preliminary examination was not held within 60 days from the date of arraignment or plea.

(2) The motion pursuant to Section 995 was granted because of any of the following reasons:

(A) Present insanity of the defendant.

(B) A lack of
 counsel after the defendant elected to self-represent rather than being represented by appointed counsel.

(C) Ineffective assistance of counsel.

(D) Conflict of interest of defense counsel.

(E) Violation of time deadlines based upon unavailability of defense counsel.

(F) Defendant’s motion to withdraw a waiver of the preliminary examination.

(3) The motion pursuant to Section 995 was granted after dismissal by the magistrate of the action pursuant to Section 871 and was recharged pursuant to Section 739.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 27.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1387.1.

(a) Where an offense is a violent felony, as defined in Section 667.5 and the prosecution has had two prior dismissals, as defined in Section 1387, the people shall be permitted one additional opportunity to refile charges where either of the prior dismissals under Section 1387 were due solely to excusable neglect. In no case shall the additional refiling of charges provided under this section be permitted where the conduct of the prosecution amounted to bad faith.

(b) As used in this section, “excusable neglect” includes, but is not limited to, error on the part of the court, prosecution, law enforcement agency, or witnesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1211, Sec. 47.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1387.2.

Upon the express consent of both the people and the defendant, in lieu of issuing an order terminating an action the court may proceed on the existing accusatory pleading. For the purposes of Section 1387, the action shall be deemed as having been previously terminated. The defendant shall be rearraigned on the accusatory pleading and a new time period pursuant to Section 859b or 1382 shall commence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 278, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1388.

(a) In any case where an order for the dismissal of a felony action is made, as provided in this chapter, and where the defendant had been released on his own recognizance for that action, if the prosecutor files another accusatory pleading against the same defendant for the same offense, unless the defendant is present in court at the time of refiling, the district attorney shall send a letter to the defendant at his last known place of residence, and shall send a copy to the attorney of record, stating that the case has been refiled, and setting forth the date, time and place for rearraignment.

(b) If the defendant fails to appear for arraignment as stated, or at such time, date, and place as has been subsequently agreed to by defendant’s counsel and the district attorney, then the court shall issue and have delivered for execution a warrant for his arrest within 20 days after his failure to appear.

(c) If the defendant was released on his own recognizance on the original charge, he shall, if he appears as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), be released on his own recognizance on the refiled charge unless it is shown that changed conditions require a different disposition, in which case bail shall be set at the discretion of the judge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Agreement on Detainers [1389. - 1389.8.]

1389.

The agreement on detainers is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this State with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:
The Agreement on Detainers

The contracting states solemnly agree that:
 
Article I
The party states find that charges outstanding against a prisoner, detainers based on untried indictments, informations or complaints, and difficulties in securing speedy trial of persons already incarcerated in other jurisdictions, produce uncertainties which obstruct programs of prisoner treatment and rehabilitation. Accordingly, it is the policy of the party states and the purpose of this agreement to encourage the expeditious and orderly disposition of such charges and determination of the proper status of any and all detainers based on untried indictments, informations or complaints. The party states also find that proceedings with reference to such charges and detainers, when emanating from another jurisdiction, cannot properly be had in the absence of cooperative procedures. It is the further purpose of this agreement to provide such cooperative procedures. 
 
Article II
As used in this agreement:

(a) “State” shall mean a state of the United States; the United States of America; a territory or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(b) “Sending state” shall mean a state in which a prisoner is incarcerated at the time that he initiates a request for final disposition pursuant to Article III hereof or at the time that a request for custody or availability is initiated pursuant to Article IV hereof.

(c) “Receiving state” shall mean the state in which trial is to be had on an indictment, information or complaint pursuant to Article III or Article IV hereof.
 
Article III
(a) Whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a penal or correctional institution of a party state, and whenever during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is pending in any other party state any untried indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which a detainer has been lodged against the prisoner, he shall be brought to trial within one hundred eighty days after he shall have caused to be delivered to the prosecuting officer and the appropriate court of the prosecuting officer’s jurisdiction written notice of the place of his imprisonment and his request for a final disposition to be made of the indictment, information or complaint: provided that for good cause shown in open court, the prisoner or his counsel being present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance. The request of the prisoner shall be accompanied by a certificate of the appropriate official having custody of the prisoner, stating the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already served, the time remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the state parole agency relating to the prisoner.

(b) The written notice and request for final disposition referred to in paragraph (a) hereof shall be given or sent by the prisoner to the warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of him, who shall promptly forward it together with the certificate to the appropriate prosecuting official and court by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.

(c) The warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of the prisoner shall promptly inform him of the source and contents of any detainer lodged against him and shall also inform him of his right to make a request for final disposition of the indictment, information or complaint on which the detainer is based.

(d) Any request for final disposition made by a prisoner pursuant to paragraph (a) hereof shall operate as a request for final disposition of all untried indictments, informations or complaints on the basis of which detainers have been lodged against the prisoner from the state to whose prosecuting official the request for final disposition is specifically directed. The warden, commissioner of corrections or other official having custody of the prisoner shall forthwith notify all appropriate prosecuting officers and courts in the several jurisdictions within the state to which the prisoner’s request for final disposition is being sent of the proceeding being initiated by the prisoner. Any notification sent pursuant to this paragraph shall be accompanied by copies of the prisoner’s written notice, request, and the certificate. If trial is not had on any indictment, information or complaint contemplated hereby prior to the return of the prisoner to the original place of imprisonment, such indictment, information or complaint shall not be of any further force or effect, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice.

(e) Any request for final disposition made by a prisoner pursuant to paragraph (a) hereof shall also be deemed to be a waiver of extradition with respect to any charge or proceeding contemplated thereby or included therein by reason of paragraph (d) hereof, and a waiver of extradition to the receiving state to serve any sentence there imposed upon him, after completion of his term of imprisonment in the sending state. The request for final disposition shall also constitute a consent by the prisoner to the production of his body in any court where his presence may be required in order to effectuate the purposes of this agreement and a further consent voluntarily to be returned to the original place of imprisonment in accordance with the provisions of this agreement. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the imposition of a concurrent sentence if otherwise permitted by law.

(f) Escape from custody by the prisoner subsequent to his execution of the request for final disposition referred to in paragraph (a) hereof shall void the request.
 
Article IV
(a) The appropriate officer of the jurisdiction in which an untried indictment, information or complaint is pending shall be entitled to have a prisoner against whom he has lodged a detainer and who is serving a term of imprisonment in any party state made available in accordance with Article V(a) hereof upon presentation of a written request for temporary custody or availability to the appropriate authorities of the state in which the prisoner is incarcerated: provided that the court having jurisdiction of such indictment, information or complaint shall have duly approved, recorded and transmitted the request: and provided further that there shall be a period of thirty days after receipt by the appropriate authorities before the request be honored, within which period the governor of the sending state may disapprove the request for temporary custody or availability, either upon his own motion or upon motion of the prisoner.

(b) Upon receipt of the officer’s written request as provided in paragraph (a) hereof, the appropriate authorities having the prisoner in custody shall furnish the officer with a certificate stating the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already served, the time remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the state parole agency relating to the prisoner. Said authorities simultaneously shall furnish all other officers and appropriate courts in the receiving state who have lodged detainers against the prisoner with similar certificates and with notices informing them of the request for custody or availability and of the reasons therefor.

(c) In respect of any proceeding made possible by this Article, trial shall be commenced within one hundred twenty days of the arrival of the prisoner in the receiving state, but for good cause shown in open court, the prisoner or his counsel being present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance.

(d) Nothing contained in this Article shall be construed to deprive any prisoner of any right which he may have to contest the legality of his delivery as provided in paragraph (a) hereof, but such delivery may not be opposed or denied on the ground that the executive authority of the sending state has not affirmatively consented to or ordered such delivery.

(e) If trial is not had on any indictment, information or complaint contemplated hereby prior to the prisoner’s being returned to the original place of imprisonment pursuant to Article V(e) hereof, such indictment, information or complaint shall not be of any further force or effect, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice.
 
Article V
(a) In response to a request made under Article III or Article IV hereof, the appropriate authority in a sending state shall offer to deliver temporary custody of such prisoner to the appropriate authority in the state where such indictment, information or complaint is pending against such person in order that speedy and efficient prosecution may be had. If the request for final disposition is made by the prisoner, the offer of temporary custody shall accompany the written notice provided for in Article III of this agreement. In the case of a federal prisoner, the appropriate authority in the receiving state shall be entitled to temporary custody as provided by this agreement or to the prisoner’s presence in federal custody at the place for trial, whichever custodial arrangement may be approved by the custodian.

(b) The officer or other representative of a state accepting an offer of temporary custody shall present the following upon demand:

(1) Proper identification and evidence of his authority to act for the state into whose temporary custody the prisoner is to be given.

(2) A duly certified copy of the indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which the detainer has been lodged and on the basis of which the request for temporary custody of the prisoner has been made.

(c) If the appropriate authority shall refuse or fail to accept temporary custody of said person, or in the event that an action on the indictment, information or complaint on the basis of which the detainer has been lodged is not brought to trial within the period provided in Article III or Article IV hereof, the appropriate court of the jurisdiction where the indictment, information or complaint has been pending shall enter an order dismissing the same with prejudice, and any detainer based thereon shall cease to be of any force or effect.

(d) The temporary custody referred to in this agreement shall be only for the purpose of permitting prosecution on the charge or charges contained in one or more untried indictments, informations or complaints which form the basis of the detainer or detainers or for prosecution on any other charge or charges arising out of the same transaction. Except for his attendance at court and while being transported to or from any place at which his presence may be required, the prisoner shall be held in a suitable jail or other facility regularly used for persons awaiting prosecution.

(e) At the earliest practicable time consonant with the purposes of this agreement, the prisoner shall be returned to the sending state.

(f) During the continuance of temporary custody or while the prisoner is otherwise being made available for trial as required by this agreement, time being served on the sentence shall continue to run but good time shall be earned by the prisoner only if, and to the extent that, the law and practice of the jurisdiction which imposed the sentence may allow.

(g) For all purposes other than that for which temporary custody as provided in this agreement is exercised, the prisoner shall be deemed to remain in the custody of and subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and any escape from temporary custody may be dealt with in the same manner as an escape from the original place of imprisonment or in any other manner permitted by law.

(h) From the time that a party state receives custody of a prisoner pursuant to this agreement until such prisoner is returned to the territory and custody of the sending state, the state in which the one or more untried indictments, informations or complaints are pending or in which trial is being had shall be responsible for the prisoner and shall also pay all costs of transporting, caring for, keeping and returning the prisoner. The provisions of this paragraph shall govern unless the states concerned shall have entered into a supplementary agreement providing for a different allocation of costs and responsibilities as between or among themselves. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to alter or affect any internal relationship among the departments, agencies and officers of and in the government of a party state, or between a party state and its subdivisions, as to the payment of costs, or responsibilities therefor.
 
Article VI
(a) In determining the duration and expiration dates of the time periods provided in Articles III and IV of this agreement, the running of said time periods shall be tolled whenever and for as long as the prisoner is unable to stand trial, as determined by the court having jurisdiction of the matter.

(b) No provision of this agreement, and no remedy made available by this agreement, shall apply to any person who is adjudged to be mentally ill. 
 
Article VII
Each state party to this agreement shall designate an officer who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this agreement, and who shall provide, within and without the state, information necessary to the effective operation of this agreement.
 
Article VIII
This agreement shall enter into full force and effect as to a party state when such state has enacted the same into law. A state party to this agreement may withdraw herefrom by enacting a statute repealing the same. However, the withdrawal of any state shall not affect the status of any proceedings already initiated by inmates or by state officers at the time such withdrawal takes effect, nor shall it affect their rights in respect thereof. 
 
Article IX
This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party hereto, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.1.

The phrase “appropriate court” as used in the agreement on detainers shall, with reference to the courts of this State, means the court in which the indictment, information, or complaint is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.2.

All courts, departments, agencies, officers, and employees of this State and its political subdivisions are hereby directed to enforce the agreement on detainer and to co-operate with one another and with other states in enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.4.

Every person who has been imprisoned in a prison or institution in this State and who escapes while in the custody of an officer of this or another state in another state pursuant to the agreement on detainers is deemed to have violated Section 4530 and is punishable as provided therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.5.

It shall be lawful and mandatory upon the warden or other official in charge of a penal or correctional institution in this State to give over the person of any inmate thereof whenever so required by the operation of the agreement on detainer. Such official shall inform such inmate of his rights provided in paragraph (a) of Article IV of the Agreement on Detainers in Section 1389 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.6.

The Administrator, Interstate Probation and Parole Compacts, shall administer this agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2115.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.7.

When, pursuant to the agreement on detainers or other provision of law, a person in actual confinement under sentence of another jurisdiction is brought before a California court and sentenced by the judge to serve a California sentence concurrently with the sentence of the other jurisdiction or has been transferred to another jurisdiction for concurrent service of previously imposed sentences, the Board of Prison Terms, and the panels and members thereof, may meet in such other jurisdiction, or enter into cooperative arrangements with corresponding agencies in the other jurisdiction, as necessary to carry out the term-fixing and parole functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.8.

It shall be the responsibility of the agent of the receiving state to return the prisoner to the sending state upon completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Proceedings Against Corporations [1390. - 1398.]

1390.

Upon the filing of an accusatory pleading against a corporation, the court shall issue a summons, signed by the judge with his name of office, requiring the corporation to appear before him, at a specified time and place, to answer the charge, the time to be not less than 10 days after the issuing of the summons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1591.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

The summons shall be substantially in the following form:

County of (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the (naming the corporation):

You are hereby summoned to appear before me at (naming the place), on (specifying the day and hour), to answer an accusatory pleading, for (designating the offense generally).

Dated this ____ day of ____, 19__.

G.H., Judge, (name of the court).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1591.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

The summons must be served at least five days before the day of appearance fixed therein, by delivering a copy thereof and showing the original to the president or other head of the corporation, or to the secretary, cashier, managing agent, or an agent of the corporation designated for service of civil process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.

At the appointed time in the summons, the magistrate shall proceed with the charge in the same manner as in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1591.)
-------------------------------------------

1396.

If an accusatory pleading is filed, the corporation may appear by counsel to answer the same, except that in the case of misdemeanors arising from operation of motor vehicles, or of infractions arising from operation of motor vehicles, a corporation may appear by its president, vice president, secretary or managing agent for the purpose of entering a plea of guilty. If it does not thus appear, a plea of not guilty shall be entered, and the same proceedings had thereon as in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 718.)
-------------------------------------------

1397.

When a fine is imposed upon a corporation on conviction, it may be collected by virtue of the order imposing it in the manner provided for enforcement of money judgments generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 140.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1398.

(a) In addition to any other penalty or fine provided by law, if a corporation is convicted of a misdemeanor or felony offense, the court may order the corporation to pay an additional fine, known as the corporate white collar criminal enhancement, pursuant to this section.

(b) The court may determine the amount of the fine. The fine shall not exceed the greater of either of the following:

(1) Two times the value of the taking or loss, whichever is greater, if the offense resulted in the taking
 of, or loss to,
 another person’s or entity’s money, labor, or real or personal property.

(2) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(c) In determining the amount of the fine under this section, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The nature and seriousness of the offense.

(2) The number of offenses committed.

(3) The persistence of the criminal conduct.

(4) The length of time over which the criminal conduct occurred.

(5) The willfulness of the corporation’s criminal
 conduct.

(6) The corporation’s assets, liabilities, and net worth, if available to the court.

(d) If, after a hearing in open court, the judge exercises their discretion in assessing the fine, they shall state the reason on the record. 

(e) Any moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be
 deposited into the California Crime Victims Fund established under Section 13839.

(f) For purposes of this section, a “corporation” means a firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, company, corporation, limited liability company, public entity, or any other legal entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 651, Sec. 3.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Entitling Affidavits [1401. - 1401.]

1401.

It is not necessary to entitle an affidavit or deposition in the action, whether taken before or after indictment or information, or upon an appeal; but if made without a title, or with an erroneous title, it is as valid and effectual for every purpose as if it were duly entitled, if it intelligibly refer to the proceeding, indictment, information, or appeal in which it is made.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Errors and Mistakes in Pleadings and Other Proceedings [1404. - 1405.1.]

1404.

Neither a departure from the form or mode prescribed by this Code in respect to any pleading or proceeding, nor an error or mistake therein, renders it invalid, unless it has actually prejudiced the defendant, or tended to his prejudice, in respect to a substantial right.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

(a) A person who was convicted of a felony and is currently serving a term of imprisonment may make a written motion, pursuant to subdivision (d), before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in their case, for performance of forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing.

(b) (1) An indigent convicted person may request appointment of counsel in order to prepare a motion pursuant to subdivision (d) by sending a written request to the court. The request shall include the person’s statement that
 they were not the perpetrator of the crime and shall explain how the DNA testing is relevant to their assertion of innocence. The request also shall include the person’s statement as to whether they previously have had counsel appointed under this section.

(2) If any of the information required in paragraph (1) is missing from the request, the court shall return the request to the convicted person and advise
 them that the matter cannot be considered without the missing information.

(3) (A) Upon a finding that the person is indigent, they have included the information required in paragraph (1), and counsel has not previously been appointed pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall appoint counsel to investigate and, if appropriate, to file a motion for DNA testing under this section and to represent the person solely for the purpose of obtaining DNA testing under this section.

(B) Upon a finding that the person is indigent, and counsel previously has been appointed pursuant to this subdivision, the court may, in its
 discretion, appoint counsel to investigate and, if appropriate, to file a motion for DNA testing under this section and to represent the person solely for the purpose of obtaining DNA testing under this section.

(4) This section does not provide for a right to the appointment of counsel in a postconviction collateral proceeding, or to set a precedent for any such right, in any context other than the representation being provided an indigent convicted person for the limited purpose of filing and litigating a motion for DNA testing pursuant to this section.

(c) Upon request of the convicted person or convicted person’s counsel, the court may order the prosecutor to make all reasonable efforts to obtain, and police agencies and law enforcement laboratories to make all reasonable efforts to provide, the following documents that are in their possession or control, if the documents
 exist:

(1) Copies of DNA lab reports, with underlying notes, prepared in connection with the laboratory testing of biological evidence from the case, including presumptive tests for the presence of biological material, serological tests, and analyses of trace evidence.

(2) Copies of evidence logs, chain of custody logs and reports, including, but not limited to, documentation of current location of biological evidence, and evidence destruction logs and reports.

(3) If the evidence has been lost or destroyed, a custodian of record shall submit a report to the prosecutor and the convicted person or convicted person’s counsel that sets forth the efforts that were made in an attempt to locate the evidence. If the last known or documented location of the evidence prior to its loss or destruction was in an area controlled
 by a law enforcement agency, the report shall include the results of a physical search of this area. If there is a record of confirmation of destruction of the evidence, the report shall include a copy of the record of confirmation of destruction in lieu of the results of a physical search of the area.

(d) (1) The motion for DNA testing shall be verified by the convicted person under penalty of perjury and shall include all of the following:

(A) A statement that they are innocent and not the perpetrator of the crime.

(B) Explain why the identity of the perpetrator was, or should have been, a
 significant issue in the case.

(C) Make every reasonable attempt to identify both the evidence that should be tested and the specific type of DNA testing sought.

(D) Explain, in light of all the evidence, how the requested DNA testing would raise a reasonable probability that the convicted person’s verdict or sentence would be more favorable if the results of DNA testing had been available at the time of conviction.

(E) Reveal the results of any DNA or other biological testing that was conducted previously by either the prosecution or defense, if known.

(F) State whether any motion for testing under this section previously has been filed and the results of that motion, if known.

(2) Notice
 of the motion shall be served on the Attorney General, the district attorney in the county of conviction, and, if known, the governmental agency or laboratory holding the evidence sought to be tested. Responses, if any, shall be filed within 90 days of the date on which the Attorney General and the district attorney are served with the motion, unless a continuance is granted for good cause.

(e) If the court finds evidence was subjected to DNA or other forensic testing previously by either the prosecution or defense, it shall order the party at whose request the testing was conducted to provide all parties and the court with access to the laboratory reports, underlying data, and laboratory notes prepared in connection with the DNA or other biological evidence testing.

(f) If the court determines that the convicted person has met all of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (F),
 inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the court may, as it deems necessary, order a hearing on the motion. The judge who conducted the trial, or accepted the convicted person’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere, shall conduct the hearing unless the presiding judge determines that judge is unavailable. Upon request of either party, the court may order, in the interest of justice, that the convicted person be present at the hearing of the motion. Either party, upon request, may request an additional 60 days to brief issues raised in subdivision (g).

(g) The court shall grant the motion for DNA testing if it determines all of the following have been established:

(1) The evidence to be tested is available and in a condition that would permit the DNA testing requested in the motion.

(2) The evidence to be tested
 has been subject to a chain of custody sufficient to establish it has not been substituted, tampered with, replaced, or altered in any material aspect.

(3) The identity of the perpetrator of the crime was, or should have been, a significant issue in the case.
